District of Columbia statutes.
32-1521

Presumptions.

In any proceeding for the enforcement of a claim for compensation under this chapter it shall be presumed, in the absence of evidence to the contrary:

(1)

That the claim comes within the provisions of this chapter;

(2)

That sufficient notice of such claim has been given;

(3)

That the injury was not occasioned solely by the intoxication of the injured employee; and

(4)

That the injury was not occasioned by the willful intention of the injured employee to injure or kill himself or another.

History

July 1, 1980, D.C. Law 3-77, § 22, 27 DCR 2503

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 36-321.